Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 13. Orders or Decisions by Municipal Boards or Commissions

§ 1141.
Boards or commissions; orders.

Any decision or order approved for issue by a board, commission, committee, agency, or authority of any municipal corporation, including the legislative body of a municipal corporation, which is required by law to be in writing, may be signed by the chair or vice chair on behalf of the issuing body.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 27, 1984.